Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-83] Effective date of sentences.
(a) Whenever a sentence of a court-martial as lawfully adjudged and approved
includes a forfeiture of pay or allowances in addition to confinement not
suspended, the forfeiture may apply to pay or allowances becoming due on or
after the date the sentence is approved by the convening authority. No
forfeiture may extend to any pay or allowances accrued before that date.

(b) Any period of confinement included in a
sentence of a court-martial begins to run from the date the sentence is
adjudged by the court-martial but periods during which the sentence to
confinement is suspended shall be excluded in computing the service of the term
of confinement. Rules adopted by the governor may provide that sentences of
confinement may not be executed until approved by designated officers.

(c) All other sentences of courts-martial are
effective on the date ordered executed. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next